Hawaii, session 2026, GM1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 11-1.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
3 "(a) The chief election officer shall be appointed by the
4 elections commission, without regard to chapter 76. The
5 appointment shall not be subject to the advice and consent of
6 the senate. In the event of a vacancy [■;—fche]^
7 (1) The elections commission shall meet expeditiously to
8 select and appoint a new chief election officer to
9 serve the remainder of the unexpired term[-r]; and
10 (2) Pending the formal selection and appointment of the
11 new chief election officer, the following positions
12 within the office of elections shall temporarily act
13 in the position of chief election officer in the
14 following order of hierarchy:
15 (A) The supervisor of election support services to
16 the extent available to serve, and if not, then;
2026-2498 SB2143 GDI SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
• • h.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 _(^ The general counsel to the extent available to
2 serve, and if not, then;
3 (C) The supervisor of counting center operations to
4 the extent available to serve, and if not, then;
5 (D) The supervisor of ballot operations to the extent
6 available to serve, and if not, then; and
7 (E) The supervisor of voter services to the extent
8 available to serve."
9 SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
10 matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
11 begun before its effective date.
12 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
13 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
14 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2498 SB2143 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiiiiHiiiiniiiinniiinNMii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 22nd day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2143, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of th^enate
Clerk of the Senate
26-26

SB No. 2143, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives